Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 7 Arkansas Crime Commission
12-8-501. Legislative intent.

The General Assembly recognizes that:

The state has a responsibility to provide competent and thorough child abuse investigations which are sensitive to the needs of children and families;

It is difficult for caseworkers with the Department of Human Services, which is currently charged with the responsibilities of investigating child abuse and providing services to children and families, to separate their dual roles as investigators and service providers;

Many studies show that child abuse investigations are compromised when these very different functions are not separated; and

Child abuse is a crime and suspected child abuse should be investigated with due diligence by trained law enforcement officers.

Therefore, it is declared to be the intent of this General Assembly to authorize the Department of Arkansas State Police to:

Create a Crimes Against Children Division, either through transfer or by contract;

Conduct investigations into severe child abuse as defined by interagency agreement; and

Administer the Child Abuse Hotline.

Unless the case involves alleged severe maltreatment, if at any point during the investigation of alleged child maltreatment the information gathered becomes sufficient for a possible criminal prosecution, then the case shall be referred for further investigation to the appropriate law enforcement agency.

The Investigation Section shall complete an investigation of all cases assigned to the Investigation Section and refer the case to a local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney for possible criminal prosecution; and

The Child Abuse Hotline Section, which shall administer twenty-four-hour toll-free inward wide-area telephone services (INWATS) to report to the Department of Arkansas State Police information regarding possible incidents of child abuse.

The division shall develop and maintain statewide statistics regarding the incidence of child abuse.

Each county and city law enforcement agency conducting child abuse investigations through referral from the Child Abuse Hotline shall report the status and disposition of these investigations to the division on a monthly basis.

If the powers and duties of the Department of Human Services in regard to the Child Abuse Hotline and child abuse investigations are transferred to the Department of Arkansas State Police, the division and the Department of Human Services shall enter into a memorandum of understanding that shall include provisions that address the sharing of information reported to the Child Abuse Hotline with the Department of Human Services when such information is necessary for the division to provide appropriate service delivery to children and families.

If the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police contract for the administration of the Child Abuse Hotline or for the Department of Arkansas State Police to conduct child abuse investigations, or both, the contract shall include provisions that address the sharing of information reported to the Child Abuse Hotline with the Department of Human Services when such information is necessary for the division to provide appropriate service delivery to children and families.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, provided:

“Contingent Effectiveness. This act shall not become effective unless an act of the Eighty-Seventh General Assembly repealing the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq., and enacting a new Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., becomes effective.”

The contingency in Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, was met by Acts 2009, No. 749.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2007 amendment, in (b)(1)(B), added “Unless the case involves alleged severe maltreatment” and inserted “alleged child maltreatment”; added (b)(1)(C); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment substituted “Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq.” for “Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq.” in (b)(1)(A).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “prosecuting attorney's” for “director's” in (b).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1240, § 1; 2001, No. 441, § 2.

12-8-502. Transfer of powers and duties — Sections of unit — Sharing of information.

When the powers and duties of the Department of Human Services in regard to the Child Abuse Hotline and child abuse investigations are transferred to the Department of Arkansas State Police or when the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police contract for the administration of the Child Abuse Hotline or for the Department of Arkansas State Police to conduct child abuse investigations, or both, the Department of Arkansas State Police shall establish a Crimes Against Children Division.

The division shall consist of two (2) sections:

(A)The Investigation Section, which shall be staffed with civilian personnel and shall be responsible for the investigation of allegations of child abuse in accordance with the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1240, § 2; 2001, No. 441, § 3; 2005, No. 1466, § 1; 2007, No. 703, § 7; 2009, No. 758, § 19.

12-8-503. Transfer of powers and duties — Executive orders — Contracts.

(1)The Governor shall issue an executive order transferring the powers and duties of the Department of Human Services in regard to the Child Abuse Hotline to the Department of Arkansas State Police by a type 2 transfer as defined in §25-2-105 or the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall enter into a contract for the administration of the Child Abuse Hotline in accordance with this subchapter.

Personnel transferred with the Child Abuse Hotline shall be required to meet employment standards and policies established by the Department of Arkansas State Police in order to retain their employment.

(1)The Governor shall issue an executive order transferring the powers and duties of the Department of Human Services in regard to child abuse investigations to the Department of Arkansas State Police by a type 2 transfer as defined in §25-2-105 or the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall enter into a contract for the Department of Arkansas State Police to conduct child abuse investigations in accordance with this subchapter.

Personnel transferred in regard to child abuse investigations shall be required to meet employment standards and policies established by the Department of Arkansas State Police in order to retain their employment.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1240, § 3.

12-8-504. Transition plan — Continuous service.

If a transfer of child abuse investigations occurs, any and all statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records, authorized positions, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds of the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Human Services for the purposes of child abuse investigations to be transferred to the Department of Arkansas State Police shall be transferred only after the development of a transition plan that will ensure the efficient and effective transfer of the powers and duties of the Department of Human Services to the Department of Arkansas State Police so that there is continuous service delivery to and protection of the children of the State of Arkansas.

If the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police enter into a contract for the Department of Arkansas State Police to conduct child abuse investigations, the contract shall include a transition plan that ensures continuous service delivery to and protection of the children of the State of Arkansas.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall submit for review any transition plan developed under this section to the House Subcommittee on Children and Youth of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1240, § 4; 2005, No. 1466, § 2.

12-8-505. Child abuse hotline and investigations.

The Child Abuse Hotline and child abuse investigations referred to in this subchapter shall be operated and conducted in accordance with the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1240, § 5; 2009, No. 758, § 20.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, provided:

“Contingent Effectiveness. This act shall not become effective unless an act of the Eighty-Seventh General Assembly repealing the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq., and enacting a new Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., becomes effective.”

The contingency in Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, was met by Acts 2009, No. 749.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq.” for “§12-12-501 et seq.”

12-8-506. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning oversight, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 713, §3. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 1240, § 6; 2005, No. 1466, § 3.

12-8-507. Abuse of patients receiving Medicaid.

Nothing contained in this subchapter shall limit or impair in any way the authority of the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit within the Attorney General's office from investigating or referring for prosecution complaints of abuse and neglect of patients of healthcare facilities which receive Medicaid funds.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1240, § 8.

12-8-508. Provision of information and assistance.

Notwithstanding a rule to the contrary, upon request of a member of the General Assembly or legislative staff or upon request of a legislative committee, the Crimes Against Children Division of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall immediately provide information requested with respect to child welfare as contemplated under the Arkansas Child Welfare Public Accountability Act, §9-32-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1727, § 6; 2005, No. 1466, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 850.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “Crimes Against Children Division” for “Family Protection Unit.”

The 2019 amendment deleted “or regulation” following “rule”.

12-8-509. Additional reporting required.

The state agency or entity responsible for administering the twenty-four-hour toll-free Child Abuse Hotline or investigating an incident of neglect as defined under § 12-18-103(14)(B) shall:

Develop and maintain statewide statistics of the incidents of neglect reported or investigated under § 12-18-103(14)(B);

Annually report no later than October 1 to the following:

The Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth;

The House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs;

The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and

TheHouse Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

The annual report under this section shall include all findings and statistics regarding incidents of neglect reported or investigated under § 12-18-103(14)(B), including, but not limited to, the following information:

The age of the mother;

The type of illegal substance to which the newborn child was exposed prenatally;

The estimated gestational age of the newborn child at the time of birth; and

The newborn child's health problems; and

Notify each mandatory reporter who makes a call to the Child Abuse Hotline if the mandatory reporter's call is not accepted or is screened out on a subsequent Child Abuse Hotline supervisor review.

The notification required under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section shall be made within forty-eight (48) hours, excluding weekends and holidays, after a mandatory reporter makes a call to the Child Abuse Hotline that is not accepted or is screened out on a subsequent Child Abuse Hotline supervisor review.

If more than one (1) state agency or entity is responsible for administering the twenty-four-hour toll-free Child Abuse Hotline or investigating an incident of neglect as defined under § 12-18-103(14)(B), then the reporting under this section shall be a collaborative effort by all state agencies or entities involved.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, provided:

“Contingent Effectiveness. This act shall not become effective unless an act of the Eighty-Seventh General Assembly repealing the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq., and enacting a new Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., becomes effective.”

The contingency in Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, was met by Acts 2009, No. 749.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 2005, No. 1176, § 1, provided:

“This act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Garrett's Law: To Provide Services to a Newborn Child Born with an Illegal Substance Present in the Child's System.’”

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (a)(3) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment substituted “§12-18-103(13)(B)” for “§12-12-503(12)(B)” in the introductory language of (a), (a)(1), (a)(2)(B), and (b).

Cross References. Garrett's Law reports, §12-18-305.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 856, § 1, provided:

“Legislative intent — Repeal of Acts 1997, No. 1057.

“(a)(1)It is the intent of the General Assembly to update the Department of Arkansas State Police Headquarters Facility and Wireless Data Equipment Financing Act as established by uncodified Acts 1997, No. 1057, by repealing Acts 1997, No. 1057, and enacting this act.

“(2)It is not the intent of the General Assembly to:

“(A)Affect any bonds issued under Acts 1997, No. 1057; or

“(B)Allow the existence of bonds issued under Acts 1997, No. 1057, to impair the effectiveness of this act or the authority given under this act.

“(b)Acts 1997, No. 1057, is repealed.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 856, § 10: Mar. 31, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain driver license fees are needed to provide vital services to the Department of Arkansas State Police; that this act will allow the use of those fees; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide a source of revenues to the department. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1176, § 4; 2007, No. 703, § 8; 2009, No. 758, § 21.

Subchapter 6

— Division of Arkansas State Police Headquarters Facilities and Equipment Financing Act

12-8-601. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Division of Arkansas State Police Headquarters Facilities and Equipment Financing Act”.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 856, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5801.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police Headquarters Facilities and Equipment Financing Act” for “Department of Arkansas State Police Headquarters Facilities and Equipment Financing Act”.

12-8-602. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

The Division of Arkansas State Police is faced daily with:

Maintaining the most efficient and secure methods of transmitting and processing information between officers in the field and headquarters;

The need to maintain and develop the most efficient means of allocating division personnel and other resources, particularly in emergency circumstances; and

The need to design, construct, and maintain facilities from which the division's personnel and resources may be stationed and deployed;

There is a need to continuously improve, upgrade, expand, and maintain the division's headquarters facilities and communication and information technology systems and equipment to support the police force and its mission to protect and serve the citizens of the state;

A designated method of financing is necessary to enable the division to obtain and maintain communication and information technology equipment and headquarters facilities;

The use of tax-exempt revenue bonds to finance communication and information technology equipment and headquarters facilities has proven to be an economical and cost-efficient method for financing equipment and facilities for the division;

Certain driver's license fees have been pledged and utilized by the Department of Arkansas State Police or the Division of Arkansas State Police since 1997 to finance equipment and facilities for the department or division;

These driver's license fees should continue to be designated as a source of funding to be utilized and pledged by the division to finance or purchase communication and information technology equipment and headquarters facilities;

Communication and information technology equipment and headquarters facilities are needed to maintain modern law enforcement and are, therefore, essential to the safety and welfare of the people of the state; and

The most feasible and least expensive way of providing a designated source for financing the acquisition and construction of headquarters facilities and communication and information technology equipment is to authorize the use of revenue bonds and designate certain driver license fees to be utilized and pledged for that purpose.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “division” for “department” and made similar changes throughout the section; substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in the introductory language of (1); and, in (5), substituted “Department of Arkansas State Police or Division of Arkansas State Police” for “department” and added “or division” at the end.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 856, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5802.

12-8-603. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Acquire” means to acquire by purchase or otherwise, construct, repair, alter, install, restore, or place on land or in a building or motor vehicle by negotiation or bidding on terms and conditions that:

Are determined by the Arkansas State Police Commission to be in the best interests of the Division of Arkansas State Police; and

Will most effectively serve the purposes of this subchapter;

“Communication and information technology equipment” means:

Wireless data and related technologies equipment, including without limitation workstations, modems, and other vehicle-based equipment, network controllers, computer-aided dispatch equipment, central information services sites with related server computers and controllers, software and information support;

Furnishings and fixtures used in connection with the operation of equipment described in subdivision (2)(A) of this section; and

Other equipment, property, and items determined by the commission to be necessary to accomplish the purpose of this subchapter;

“Cost” means the costs related to a headquarters facility or communication and information technology equipment, including without limitation the following:

The costs of the acquisition of communication and information technology equipment and the related costs, including without limitation engineering, architectural, consulting, and related services;

The cost of acquiring an interest in real estate for the location of a headquarters facility that provides necessary or recommended access or buffer zones or that facilitates the delivery of utility services and the related costs, including without limitation engineering, architectural, consulting, and related services;

The cost of the preparation of plans, specifications, studies, surveys, and estimates of cost and revenues;

Other expenses necessary or incident to planning, providing, or determining the need for or the feasibility of the headquarters facility or communication and information technology equipment;

The costs of related software for the operation and support of the communication and information technology equipment;

The costs of database development and other information sources and the training required for the efficient use of communication and information technology equipment; and

The costs paid or incurred in connection with the issuance of bonds by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to finance the acquisition, development, upgrade, improvement, or expansion of a headquarters facility or communication and information technology equipment;

“Debt service payment” means a payment to be made by the division from pledged revenues or other legally available sources to secure and provide for payments due on any bonds or other obligations issued by the authority to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter;

“Financing documents” means a note and mortgage, loan agreement, lease purchase agreement, trust indenture, and related documents executed in connection with the issuance of bonds by the authority to finance headquarters facilities or communication and information technology equipment;

“Headquarters facility” means part or all of one (1) or more items or properties used by the division to accomplish or facilitate its purposes, including without limitation:

Land, buildings, fixtures, infrastructure, improvements, furniture, equipment, software, and personal property necessary or convenient to the land, buildings, fixtures, infrastructure, improvements, furniture, equipment, and software; and

Engineering, design, construction, or architectural plans related to a property used by the division;

“Pledged revenues” means the fees generated under § 27-16-801(a) and § 27-23-118(a)(3) that may be pledged for the security and payment of debt service payments under this subchapter; and

“Purchase agreement” means an agreement entered into by the commission with a vendor to acquire a headquarters facility or communication and information technology equipment.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (1)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” in the introductory language of (6) and in (6)(B).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 856, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5803, 5804.

12-8-604. Pledge of revenues.

The fees generated under §27-16-801(a) and §27-23-118(a)(3) shall be:

Pledged to meet obligations authorized under this subchapter; and

Used by the Division of Arkansas State Police as provided in this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (2).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 856, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5805.

12-8-605. Arkansas State Police Commission — Powers.

The Arkansas State Police Commission may:

Acquire, construct, repair, renovate, alter, maintain, and equip headquarters facilities and communication and information technology equipment;

Contract to acquire headquarters facilities and communication and information technology equipment on the terms and conditions specified by this subchapter and approved by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police with the consent of the commission;

Provide for the payment of the costs associated with the acquisition of headquarters facilities and communication and information technology equipment from any legally available source, including without limitation pledged revenues and funds appropriated and made available under § 12-8-101 et seq.;

Enter into financing documents and agreements with the Arkansas Development Finance Authority that are necessary and appropriate to secure obligations issued by the authority that will facilitate the acquisition of the headquarters facilities and communication and information technology equipment; and

Take other action, not inconsistent with law, that may be necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the powers, purposes, and authority stated in this subchapter or to carry out the intent of this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (2).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 856, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5806.

12-8-606. Use of pledged revenues.

The debt service payments and other costs relating to a headquarters facility or communication and information technology equipment shall be secured by a lien on and pledge of the pledged revenues.

To the extent that pledged revenues are not required to make debt service payments, the pledged revenues shall be released to the Division of Arkansas State Police to provide operating funds as described in this section.

All pledged revenues are cash funds restricted in their use and dedicated and to be used solely as provided in this subchapter.

When pledged revenues are received by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, the Office of Motor Vehicle, the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Arkansas State Police Commission, the Department of Finance and Administration, or any other state agency, the pledged revenues shall be deposited as cash funds into a bank selected by the Division of Arkansas State Police to the credit of the Division of Arkansas State Police Financing Fund.

On the date that the Arkansas Development Finance Authority issues bonds under this subchapter and the Arkansas Development Finance Authority Act, § 15-5-101 et seq., §§ 15-5-201 — 15-5-211, 15-5-213, and 15-5-301 — 15-5-316, any revenues in the Division of Arkansas State Police Financing Fund shall be pledged revenues.

Debt service payments shall be paid from the Division of Arkansas State Police Financing Fund as stated in the financing documents.

If all debt service payments have been properly made on the last day of each fiscal quarter, the pledged revenues remaining in the Division of Arkansas State Police Financing Fund shall be withdrawn from the Division of Arkansas State Police Financing Fund and deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to the credit of the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund.

However, if any debt service payments remain to be paid under this subchapter, all moneys in the Division of Arkansas State Police Financing Fund shall continue to be pledged to the debt service payments and other costs in connection with the bonds and the maintenance of reserves, notwithstanding the right of the Division of Arkansas State Police to withdraw funds on the last day of each fiscal quarter if debt service payments are current.

If any debt service payments remain to be made, the General Assembly may modify or change the pledged revenues only if there are always maintained in effect and made available for the payment of debt service payments sources of revenue comparable in amount and time of receipt that produce revenues sufficient to provide for and secure debt service payments when due.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” and made similar changes throughout the section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police Financing Fund” for “Department of Arkansas State Police Financing Fund” in the section heading and in (a); and substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 856, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5807.

12-8-607. Division of Arkansas State Police Financing Fund.

There is created the Division of Arkansas State Police Financing Fund.

The fund is a cash fund of the Division of Arkansas State Police and shall be used as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 856, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5808.

12-8-608. Sunset.

This subchapter shall expire twenty (20) years from March 31, 2015.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 856, § 2.